Connecticut, session 2026, HB05258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47a-1 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
As used in this chapter, sections 47a-21, 47a-23 to 47a-23c, inclusive,
47a-26a to 47a-26g, inclusive, 47a-35 to 47a-35b, inclusive, 47a-41a, 47a-
43 and 47a-46 and section 2 of this act:
(1) "Action" includes recoupment, counterclaim, set-off, cause of
action and any other proceeding in which rights are determined,
including an action for possession.
(2) "Building and housing codes" include any law, ordinance or
governmental regulation concerning fitness for habitation or the
construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use or appearance of
any premises or dwelling unit.
(3) "Dwelling unit" means any house or building, or portion thereof,
which is occupied, is designed to be occupied, or is rented, leased or
hired out to be occupied, as a home or residence of one or more persons.
(4) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor or sublessor of the dwelling
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5258
unit, the building of which it is a part or the premises.
(5) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom
is vested (A) all or part of the legal title to property, or (B) all or part of
the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the
premises and includes a mortgagee in possession.
(6) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability
company, the state or any political subdivision thereof, or agency,
business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, two or more
persons having a joint or common interest, and any other legal or
commercial entity.
(7) "Premises" means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is
a part and facilities and appurtenances therein and grounds, areas and
facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is
promised to the tenant.
(8) "Rent" means all periodic payments to be made to the landlord
under the rental agreement.
(9) "Rental agreement" means all agreements, written or oral, and
valid rules and regulations adopted under section 47a-9 or subsection
(d) of section 21-70 embodying the terms and conditions concerning the
use and occupancy of a dwelling unit or premises.
(10) "Roomer" means a person occupying a dwelling unit, which unit
does not include a refrigerator, stove, kitchen sink, toilet and shower or
bathtub and one or more of these facilities are used in common by other
occupants in the structure.
(11) "Single-family residence" means a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit or has a common parking
facility, it is a single-family residence if it has direct access to a street or
thoroughfare and does not share heating facilities, hot water equipment
or any other essential facility or service with any other dwelling unit.
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5258
(12) "Tenant" means the lessee, sublessee or person entitled under a
rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit or premises to the exclusion
of others or as is otherwise defined by law.
(13) "Tenement house" means any house or building, or portion
thereof, which is rented, leased or hired out to be occupied, or is
arranged or designed to be occupied, or is occupied, as the home or
residence of three or more families, living independently of each other,
and doing their cooking upon the premises, and having a common right
in the halls, stairways or yards.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Tenant organizer" means an individual who (A) assists tenants in
establishing and operating a tenant organization or in organizing
tenants to address the affairs of such dwelling unit or other dwelling
units owned or managed by the owner of the dwelling unit or the
owner's agents, and (B) is not an employee or agent of such dwelling
unit's current or prospective owners, managers or agents.
(2) "Tenant organization" means an organization that (A) is
established by tenants of a dwelling unit or of multiple dwelling units
owned or managed by the same owner or owner's agent; (B) is
established for the purpose of addressing issues related to the tenants'
living environment, including the terms and conditions of their tenancy
as well as activities related to housing and community development; (C)
meets regularly; and (D) operates independently from the authority of
the owner of such dwelling units and the owner's agents.
(b) An owner of any dwelling unit, except those exempted from the
application of title 47a of the general statutes pursuant to section 47a-2
of the general statutes, and any agents of such owner, shall permit
tenants, tenants' authorized agents and tenant organizers who are
accompanied by tenants to conduct the following activities related to the
establishment or operation of a tenant organization, provided such
activities are conducted in a reasonable manner and in compliance with
all applicable law:
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5258
(1) Distributing leaflets in common areas, including lobby areas;
(2) Placing leaflets at or under tenants' doors;
(3) Initiating contact with tenants;
(4) Conducting door-to-door surveys of tenants to ascertain interest
in establishing a tenant organization, to offer information about existing
tenant organizations or to offer information about the legal rights of
tenants;
(5) Posting information on bulletin boards, provided such postings
comply with the requirements of subsection (d) of this section;
(6) Assisting tenants in participating in tenant organization activities;
(7) Holding meetings, including political caucuses or forums for
speeches of public officials or candidates for public office, without the
presence of the dwelling unit's owner or such owner's agent, conducted
at reasonable times and in an orderly manner on the premises, held in
any community room or recreation room, if such rooms are open for the
use of tenants, or in common areas, including, but not limited to,
laundry rooms, hallways and lobbies, if a community or recreation room
is not available; and
(8) Performing other reasonable and lawful activities related to the
establishment or operation of a tenant organization.
100 (c) The owner of a dwelling unit or the agent of such owner shall not
101 require tenants, tenants' authorized agents or tenant organizers to
102 obtain prior permission before engaging in activities described in
103 subsection (b) of this section, except that the owner may apply such
104 owner's generally applicable rules governing advance reservation of
105 community or recreation rooms.
106 (d) Any owner who issues generally applicable rules governing the
107 use of bulletin boards by tenants or other displays of information in
108 common areas may not specifically exclude the posting of information
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5258
109 related to tenant organizing activities if the rules permit posting of other
110 types of information by tenants.
111 Sec. 3. Section 47a-20 of the general statutes is repealed and the
112 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
113 (a) A landlord shall not maintain an action or proceeding against a
114 tenant to recover possession of a dwelling unit, demand an increase in
115 rent from the tenant, or decrease the services to which the tenant has
116 been entitled within six months after: (1) The tenant has in good faith
117 attempted to remedy by any lawful means, including contacting
118 officials of the state or of any town, city or borough or public agency or
119 filing a complaint with a fair rent commission, any condition
120 constituting a violation of any provisions of chapter 368o, or of chapter
121 412, or of any other state statute or regulation, or of the housing and
122 health ordinances of the municipality wherein the premises which are
123 the subject of the complaint lie; (2) any municipal agency or official has
124 filed a notice, complaint or order regarding such a violation; (3) the
125 tenant has in good faith requested the landlord to make repairs; (4) the
126 tenant has in good faith instituted an action under subsections (a) to (i),
127 inclusive, of section 47a-14h; or (5) the tenant has organized or become
128 a member of a tenants' union, other than the activities specified in
129 section 2 of this act.
130 (b) A landlord shall not maintain an action or proceeding against a
131 tenant to recover possession of a dwelling unit or decrease the services
132 to which the tenant has been entitled within four months after the tenant
133 has participated in any of the activities described in section 2 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-1
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 47a-20
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5258
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(c), "community space" was changed to "community or
recreation rooms" for consistency.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6